Mississippi, session 2026, SB2789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "DNA Match Notification, Tracking, and Accountability Act." SECTION 2. The purpose of this act is to ensure that all reportable DNA database matches generated by accredited forensic laboratories are: (a)  Promptly communicated to the appropriate law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies; and (b)  Receive documented, timely follow-up. SECTION 3. For purposes of this act, the following terms have the meaning herein ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety. (b)  "DNA database match" means any confirmed association reported by a crime laboratory between a DNA profile from an evidentiary sample and a known individual or another evidentiary sample in a government-operated DNA database, including, but not limited to, CODIS or any state or local DNA index. (c)  "Crime laboratory" means any laboratory accredited to perform forensic DNA analysis for criminal justice purposes. (d)  "Notifying agency" means the crime laboratory issuing the DNA database match notification. (e)  "Receiving agency" means any law enforcement, prosecutorial, or investigative agency designated to receive DNA match notifications under state or local procedures. (f)  "Tracking system" or the "automated DNA match tracking system" means the electronic, centralized platform established under Section 4 of this act for the recording, monitoring, and reporting of DNA match notifications and subsequent investigative or prosecutorial actions. SECTION 4. (1)  No later than one (1) year from the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Public Safety shall establish and maintain a statewide automated DNA match tracking system subject to appropriation by the Legislature. (2)  The Department may: (a)  Purchase a commercial off-the-shelf software system for tracking, if the system meets all of the requirements of this section. (b) Apply for federal funding to establish and maintain the tracking system. (3)  The tracking system shall: (a)  Be electronic and cloud-based; (b)  Receive DNA match notifications from all accredited crime laboratories; (c)  Automatically route notifications and reminders to designated receiving agencies; (d)  Record and timestamp subsequent actions taken by receiving agencies, and flag notifications for supervisory review upon missed deadlines or inactivity; (e)  Produce audit logs, compliance reports, and performance metrics; (f)  Ensure data security consistent with applicable privacy and information-security laws. SECTION 5. (1)  Upon confirmation of a DNA database match, the notifying agency shall transmit an electronic notification to the tracking system within ten (10) business days. (2)  Receiving agencies shall review each DNA match notification within five (5) business days of receipt. (3)  Within sixty (60) days of recording the initial match review, a receiving agency must document and update in the tracking system: (a)  Whether the match is relevant to an active investigation or case; (b)  Investigative or prosecutorial actions taken; and (c)  Closure or declination decisions and the rationale for such decisions. SECTION 6. (1)  All law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies in the state that submit DNA evidence to an accredited crime lab in this state shall participate in the tracking system as a requirement of submitting DNA evidence. (2)  Each receiving agency shall designate a supervisory official responsible for ensuring timely updates and addressing overdue or incomplete follow-ups. (3)  The department shall: (a)  Publish an annual report containing: (i)  Total number of DNA database matches; (ii)  Average time from notification to first recorded action; (iii)  Number of overdue or unaddressed notifications; and (iv) Recommendations for improving performance; (b)  Promulgate rules and regulations effectuate the purposes of this act; and (c)  Provide training for laboratory, law enforcement, and prosecutorial personnel SECTION 7. (1)  All information stored or transmitted under this act shall be handled in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local privacy laws, including, but not limited to, limitations on dissemination of DNA information. (2)  Access to the tracking system shall be limited to authorized personnel. (3)  The tracking system shall serve only as a resource for coordinated criminal justice response purposes.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law or court rule, information entered into the tracking system shall not serve as an official status of the case and shall not be admissible in a criminal proceeding. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.